District of Columbia statutes.
50-1122

Duration of Task Force.

The Task Force shall complete its study and submit its report to the Council and Mayor no later than February 28, 2011.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 6093, 57 DCR 6242
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6093 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).